tex/old/pt_BR.aff
SFX V Y 836
SFX V  ar   á   ar
SFX V  er   ê   er
SFX V  ir   í   ir
SFX V  or   ô   or
SFX V   ir   eio       vir
SFX V   ir   ém        vir
SFX V   ir   êm        vir
SFX V   ir   enha      vir
SFX V   ir   enhais    vir
SFX V   ir   enham     vir
SFX V   ir   enhamos   vir
SFX V   ir   enhas     vir
SFX V   ir   enho      vir
SFX V   ir   éns       vir
SFX V   r    emos      vir
SFX V   r    er        vir
SFX V   r    era       vir
SFX V   r    eram      vir
SFX V   r    éramos    vir
SFX V   r    eras      vir
SFX V   r    erdes     vir
SFX V   r    éreis     vir
SFX V   r    erem      vir
SFX V   r    eres      vir
SFX V   r    ermos     vir
SFX V   r    esse      vir
SFX V   r    ésseis    vir
SFX V   r    essem     vir
SFX V   r    éssemos   vir
SFX V   r    esses     vir
SFX V   r    este      vir
SFX V   r    estes     vir
SFX V   r    m         vir
SFX V   r    mos       vir
SFX V   r    nde       vir
SFX V   r    ndes      vir
SFX V   r    ndo       vir
SFX V   r    nha       vir
SFX V   r    nham      vir
SFX V   ir   ínhamos   vir
SFX V   r    nhas      vir
SFX V   ir   ínheis    vir
SFX V   0    á         vir
SFX V   0    ão        vir
SFX V   0    ás        vir
SFX V   0    des       vir
SFX V   0    ei        vir
SFX V   0    eis       vir
SFX V   0    em        vir
SFX V   0    emos      vir
SFX V   0    es        vir
SFX V   0    ia        vir
SFX V   0    iam       vir
SFX V   0    íamos     vir
SFX V   0    ias       vir
SFX V   0    íeis      vir
SFX V   0    mos       vir
SFX V   er   ém       ter
SFX V   er   êm       ter
SFX V   r    mos      ter
SFX V   r    nde      ter
SFX V   r    ndes     ter
SFX V   r    ndo      ter
SFX V   r    nha      ter
SFX V   r    nhais    ter
SFX V   r    nham     ter
SFX V   r    nhamos   ter
SFX V   r    nhas     ter
SFX V   r    nho      ter
SFX V   er   éns      ter
SFX V   0    á        ter
SFX V   0    ão       ter
SFX V   0    ás       ter
SFX V   0    des      ter
SFX V   0    ei       ter
SFX V   0    eis      ter
SFX V   0    em       ter
SFX V   0    emos     ter
SFX V   0    es       ter
SFX V   0    ia       ter
SFX V   0    iam      ter
SFX V   0    íamos    ter
SFX V   0    ias      ter
SFX V   0    íeis     ter
SFX V   0    mos      ter
SFX V   r    ve       ter
SFX V   er   inha     ter
SFX V   er   inham    ter
SFX V   er   ínhamos  ter
SFX V   er   inhas    ter
SFX V   er   ínheis   ter
SFX V   er   ive      ter
SFX V   er   ivemos   ter
SFX V   er   iver     ter
SFX V   er   ivera    ter
SFX V   er   iveram   ter
SFX V   er   ivéramos ter
SFX V   er   iveras   ter
SFX V   er   iverdes  ter
SFX V   er   ivéreis  ter
SFX V   er   iverem   ter
SFX V   er   iveres   ter
SFX V   er   ivermos  ter
SFX V   er   ivesse   ter
SFX V   er   ivésseis ter
SFX V   er   ivessem  ter
SFX V   er   ivéssemos  ter
SFX V   er   ivesses  ter
SFX V   er   iveste   ter
SFX V   er   ivestes  ter
SFX V   ir      em       air
SFX V   r       0        air
SFX V   ir      í        air
SFX V   r       a        air
SFX V   ir      ía       air
SFX V   r       ais      air
SFX V   r       am       air
SFX V   ir      íam      air
SFX V   r       amos     air
SFX V   ir      íamos    air
SFX V   r       as       air
SFX V   ir      ías      air
SFX V   ir      ída      air
SFX V   ir      ídas     air
SFX V   ir      ído      air
SFX V   ir      ídos     air
SFX V   ir      íeis     air
SFX V   ir      ímos     air
SFX V   r       ndo      air
SFX V   r       o        air
SFX V   0       á        air
SFX V   ir      íra      air
SFX V   ir      íram     air
SFX V   ir      íramos   air
SFX V   0       ão       air
SFX V   0       ás       air
SFX V   ir      íras     air
SFX V   0       des      air
SFX V   0       ei       air
SFX V   0       eis      air
SFX V   ir      íreis    air
SFX V   ir      írem     air
SFX V   0       emos     air
SFX V   ir      íres     air
SFX V   0       ia       air
SFX V   0       iam      air
SFX V   0       íamos    air
SFX V   0       ias      air
SFX V   0       íeis     air
SFX V   0       mos      air
SFX V   r       s        air
SFX V   ir      ís       air
SFX V   ir      ísse     air
SFX V   ir      ísseis   air
SFX V   ir      íssem    air
SFX V   ir      íssemos  air
SFX V   ir      ísses    air
SFX V   ir      íste     air
SFX V   ir      ístes    air
SFX V   r       u        air
SFX V   ir     e       gir
SFX V   ir     em      gir
SFX V   ir     es      gir
SFX V   r      0       gir
SFX V   r      a       gir
SFX V   r      am      gir
SFX V   ir     íamos   gir
SFX V   0      as      gir
SFX V   r      as      gir
SFX V   r      do      gir
SFX V   r      dos     gir
SFX V   r      da      gir
SFX V   r      das     gir
SFX V   ir     íeis    gir
SFX V   r      mos     gir
SFX V   r      ndo     gir
SFX V   0      a       gir
SFX V   0      á       gir
SFX V   0      am      gir
SFX V   ir     íramos  gir
SFX V   0      ão      gir
SFX V   0      ás      gir
SFX V   0      des     gir
SFX V   0      ei      gir
SFX V   0      eis     gir
SFX V   ir     íreis   gir
SFX V   0      em      gir
SFX V   0      emos    gir
SFX V   0      es      gir
SFX V   0      ia      gir
SFX V   0      iam     gir
SFX V   0      íamos   gir
SFX V   0      ias     gir
SFX V   0      íeis    gir
SFX V   0      mos     gir
SFX V   r      s       gir
SFX V   r      sse     gir
SFX V   ir     ísseis  gir
SFX V   r      ssem    gir
SFX V   ir     íssemos  gir
SFX V   r      sses    gir
SFX V   r      ste     gir
SFX V   r      stes    gir
SFX V   r      u       gir
SFX V   gir    ja      gir
SFX V   gir    jais    gir
SFX V   gir    jam     gir
SFX V   gir    jamos   gir
SFX V   gir    jas     gir
SFX V   gir    jo      gir
SFX V   ir     e       guir
SFX V   ir     em      guir
SFX V   ir     es      guir
SFX V   r      0       guir
SFX V   r      a       guir
SFX V   r      am      guir
SFX V   ir     íamos   guir
SFX V   r      as      guir
SFX V   r      do      guir
SFX V   r      dos     guir
SFX V   r      da      guir
SFX V   r      das     guir
SFX V   ir     íeis    guir
SFX V   r      mos     guir
SFX V   r      ndo     guir
SFX V   0      a       guir
SFX V   0      á       guir
SFX V   0      am      guir
SFX V   ir     íramos  guir
SFX V   0      ão      guir
SFX V   0      as      guir
SFX V   0      ás      guir
SFX V   0      des     guir
SFX V   0      ei      guir
SFX V   0      eis     guir
SFX V   0      em      guir
SFX V   0      emos    guir
SFX V   0      es      guir
SFX V   0      ia      guir
SFX V   0      iam     guir
SFX V   0      íamos   guir
SFX V   0      ias     guir
SFX V   0      íeis    guir
SFX V   0      mos     guir
SFX V   r      s       guir
SFX V   r      sse     guir
SFX V   ir     ísseis  guir
SFX V   ir     íreis   guir
SFX V   r      ssem    guir
SFX V   ir     íssemos   guir
SFX V   r      sses    guir
SFX V   r      ste     guir
SFX V   r      stes    guir
SFX V   r      u       guir
SFX V   eguir  iga     eguir
SFX V   eguir  igais   eguir
SFX V   eguir  igam    eguir
SFX V   eguir  igamos  eguir
SFX V   eguir  igas    eguir
SFX V   eguir  igo     eguir
SFX V   guir    ga      nguir
SFX V   guir    gais    nguir
SFX V   guir    gam     nguir
SFX V   guir    gamos   nguir
SFX V   guir    gas     nguir
SFX V   guir    go      nguir
SFX V   ir    a       [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    ais     [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    am      [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    amos    [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    as      [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    em      [üu]ir
SFX V   r     0       [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    í       [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    ía      [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    íam     [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    íamos   [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    ías     [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    ída     [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    ídas    [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    ído     [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    ídos    [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    íeis    [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    ímos    [üu]ir
SFX V   r     ndo     [üu]ir
SFX V   0     á       [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    íra     [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    íram    [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    íramos  [üu]ir
SFX V   0     ão      [üu]ir
SFX V   0     ás      [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    íras    [üu]ir
SFX V   0     des     [üu]ir
SFX V   0     ei      [üu]ir
SFX V   0     eis     [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    íreis   [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    írem    [üu]ir
SFX V   0     emos    [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    íres    [üu]ir
SFX V   0     ia      [üu]ir
SFX V   0     iam     [üu]ir
SFX V   0     íamos   [üu]ir
SFX V   0     ias     [üu]ir
SFX V   0     íeis    [üu]ir
SFX V   0     mos     [üu]ir
SFX V   r     s       [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    ís      [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    ísse    [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    ísseis  [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    íssem   [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    íssemos [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    ísses   [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    íste    [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    ístes   [üu]ir
SFX V   r     u       [üu]ir
SFX V   ir    o       [üu]ir
SFX V   er    a          oer
SFX V   er    ais        oer
SFX V   er    am         oer
SFX V   er    amos       oer
SFX V   er    as         oer
SFX V   er    ei         oer
SFX V   r     is         oer
SFX V   r     m          oer
SFX V   r     mos        oer
SFX V   r     ndo        oer
SFX V   0     a          oer
SFX V   0     á          oer
SFX V   0     am         oer
SFX V   er    êramos     oer
SFX V   0     ão         oer
SFX V   0     as         oer
SFX V   0     ás         oer
SFX V   0     des        oer
SFX V   0     ei         oer
SFX V   0     eis        oer
SFX V   er    êreis      oer
SFX V   0     em         oer
SFX V   0     emos       oer
SFX V   0     es         oer
SFX V   0     ia         oer
SFX V   0     iam        oer
SFX V   0     íamos      oer
SFX V   0     ias        oer
SFX V   0     íeis       oer
SFX V   0     mos        oer
SFX V   r     sse        oer
SFX V   er    êsseis     oer
SFX V   r     ssem       oer
SFX V   er    êssemos    oer
SFX V   r     sses       oer
SFX V   r     ste        oer
SFX V   r     stes       oer
SFX V   r     u          oer
SFX V   er    í          oer
SFX V   oer   ói         oer
SFX V   er    ía         oer
SFX V   er    íam        oer
SFX V   er    íamos      oer
SFX V   er    ías        oer
SFX V   er    ída        oer
SFX V   er    ídas       oer
SFX V   er    ído        oer
SFX V   er    ídos       oer
SFX V   er    íeis       oer
SFX V   oer   óis        oer
SFX V   er    o          oer
SFX V   er     a     chover
SFX V   r      0     chover
SFX V   r      ndo   chover
SFX V   0      a     chover
SFX V   0      á     chover
SFX V   0      ia    chover
SFX V   r      sse   chover
SFX V   r      u     chover
SFX V   er     ia    chover
SFX V   er     ida   chover
SFX V   er     idas  chover
SFX V   er     ido   chover
SFX V   er     idos  chover
SFX V  r     0       valer 
SFX V  r     i       valer
SFX V  r     is      valer
SFX V  r     lem     valer
SFX V  r     m       valer
SFX V  r     mos     valer
SFX V  r     ndo     valer
SFX V  0     a       valer
SFX V  0     á       valer
SFX V  0     am      valer
SFX V  er    êramos  valer
SFX V  0     ão      valer
SFX V  0     as      valer
SFX V  0     ás      valer
SFX V  0     des     valer
SFX V  0     ei      valer
SFX V  0     eis     valer
SFX V  er    êreis   valer
SFX V  0     em      valer
SFX V  0     emos    valer
SFX V  0     es      valer
SFX V  0     ia      valer
SFX V  0     iam     valer
SFX V  0     íamos   valer
SFX V  0     ias     valer
SFX V  0     íeis    valer
SFX V  0     mos     valer
SFX V  r     s       valer
SFX V  r     sse     valer
SFX V  er    êsseis  valer
SFX V  r     ssem    valer
SFX V  er    êssemos     valer
SFX V  r     sses    valer
SFX V  r     ste     valer
SFX V  r     stes    valer
SFX V  r     u       valer
SFX V  er    ha      valer
SFX V  er    hais    valer
SFX V  er    ham     valer
SFX V  er    hamos   valer
SFX V  er    has     valer 
SFX V  er    ho      valer
SFX V  er    i       valer
SFX V  er    ia      valer
SFX V  er    iam     valer
SFX V  er    íamos   valer
SFX V  er    ias     valer
SFX V  er    íeis    valer
SFX V  r    0        gar
SFX V  r    do       gar
SFX V  r    dos      gar
SFX V  r    da       gar
